Indiana, session 2026, SB79.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-1-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 17. (a) The following definitions apply
throughout this section:
(1) "Data center" has the meaning set forth in IC 8-1-44.5-1.
(2) "Electricity supplier" means a:
(A) public utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(a));
(B) municipally owned utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(h));
(C) corporation organized under IC 8-1-13; or
(D) corporation organized under IC 23-17 that is an
electric cooperative and that has at least one (1) member
that is a corporation organized under IC 8-1-13;
that furnishes retail electric service to customers in Indiana.
(b) The commission shall establish a working group composed
of:
(1) the chairman of the commission, or the chairman's
designee;
2026 IN 79—LS 6429/DI 119


(2) the secretary of commerce, or the secretary's designee;
and
(3) the following members appointed by the chairman of the
commission:
(A) One (1) or more representatives of electricity suppliers.
(B) One (1) or more representatives of the data center
industry.
(C) One (1) or more representatives of regional
transmission agencies whose control area, as approved by
the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, includes any
part of Indiana.
(D) One (1) or more other stakeholders with respect to
electric utility service in Indiana.
(c) The chairman of the commission, or the chairman's designee,
serves as:
(1) the chair; and
(2) a nonvoting member;
of the working group.
(d) The working group shall meet at the call of the working
group's chair.
(e) A majority of the members of the working group constitutes
a quorum.
(f) A member of the working group who is a member of the
general assembly is a nonvoting member of the working group.
(g) The affirmative vote of a majority of the voting members of
the working group is required for the working group to take action
on any measure, including adoption of the report under subsection
(m).
(h) The commission shall staff and provide oversight for the
working group.
(i) Except as provided under subsection (l), the expenses of the
working group shall be paid from funds appropriated to the
commission.
(j) A member of the working group who is not a state employee
is not entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is, however, entitled to
reimbursement for mileage and traveling expenses as provided
under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in
connection with the member's duties as provided in the state
policies and procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(k) Each member of the working group who is a state employee,
2026 IN 79—LS 6429/DI 119


but who is not a member of the general assembly, is entitled to
reimbursement for mileage and traveling expenses as provided
under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in
connection with the member's duties as provided in the state
policies and procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(l) Each member of the working group who is a member of the
general assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage,
and travel allowances paid to legislative members of interim study
committees established by the legislative council. Per diem,
mileage, and travel allowances paid under this section shall be paid
from appropriations made to the legislative council or the
legislative services agency.
(m) The working group shall:
(1) determine an estimate of the future electricity demands of
the data center industry in Indiana; and
(2) not later than October 31, 2026, adopt and submit to the
director of the legislative services agency, for distribution to
the members of the general assembly, a report containing:
(A) the working group's findings under subdivision (1);
and
(B) any legislative or administrative agency action the
working group recommends in light of the working group's
findings under subdivision (1).
The report submitted under subdivision (2) must be in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(n) This section expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-44.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 44.5. Data Centers
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "data center" means a facility:
(1) the primary services of which are the storage,
management, and processing of digital data; and
(2) that is used to house:
(A) computer and network systems, including associated
components such as servers, network equipment,
telecommunications equipment, and data storage systems;
(B) systems for monitoring and managing infrastructure
performance;
(C) equipment used for the transformation, transmission,
distribution, or management of at least one (1) megawatt
2026 IN 79—LS 6429/DI 119


of electrical power, including substations, uninterruptible
power supply systems, and all electrical plant equipment;
(D) Internet related equipment and services;
(E) data communications connections;
(F) environmental controls, including cooling equipment
and associated air handlers;
(G) fire protection systems; and
(H) security systems and services.
Sec. 2. (a) A person that operates a data center in Indiana shall
submit to the commission a quarterly report of the amount of
electricity, disaggregated by the source of the electricity, used by
the data center in the immediately preceding quarter.
(b) The commission shall publish a summary of the information
reported to the commission under subsection (a), in aggregated and
deidentified form, on the commission's website.
SECTION 3. IC 36-7-4-1112 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1112. (a) The definitions in
section 1109 of this chapter apply throughout this section.
(b) As used in this section, "data center" has the meaning set
forth in IC 8-1-44.5-1.
(c) A local authority of a unit shall, before issuing a permit to a
person for construction of a data center:
(1) require the person to disclose the projected power and
water usage of the facility at the facility's full operating
capacity; and
(2) perform a site assessment to determine the possible effects
of the data center on:
(A) water usage in the unit;
(B) the electrical grid serving the unit;
(C) carbon emissions; and
(D) agricultural, historic, and cultural resources in the
unit.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 79—LS 6429/DI 119